Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-617.15
Delayed birth certificate; fees.

(1) The department shall charge and collect the same fee as prescribed in subsection (1) of section 71-612 when an application for a delayed birth certificate is filed. All such fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund. The department shall collect an additional fee of one dollar when a delayed birth certificate is issued. All amounts collected from such additional fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Child Abuse Prevention Fund.

(2) Upon request and payment of the fees required by section 71-612, a certified copy of a delayed birth certificate shall be furnished by the department. All fees for a certified copy shall be handled as provided in section 71-612.

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 22;

Laws 1986, LB 333, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 31;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 54;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 33;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 535;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 154;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 48, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 58;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 87;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 428.